District of Columbia statutes.
34-1107

Valuation; notice and hearing; statement of valuation to be filed.

Before final determination of such value the Commission shall, after notice of not less than 30 days to the public utility, hold a public hearing as to such valuation in the manner hereinafter provided for a hearing, which provisions, so far as applicable, shall apply to such hearing. The Commission shall, within 10 days after such valuation is determined, serve a statement thereof upon the public utility interested, and shall file a like statement with the District committees in Congress.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 978, ch. 150, § 8, par. 8

History

Rules and regulations, power of Commission to adopt, see § 34-902.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 43-507.
1973 Ed., § 43-307.

Prior Codifications